Tennessee, session 114, HB1871.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 39-13-210(c), is amended by adding
the following as a new subdivision:
(3) Notwithstanding title 40, chapter 35, a person convicted of a violation of
subdivision (a)(1) shall be punished as a Range II offender; however, the sentence
imposed upon such person may, if appropriate, be within Range III but in no case shall it
be lower than Range II.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect July 1, 2026, the public welfare requiring it, and
applies to acts committed on or after that date.
HB1871
010886
- 1 -